Tennessee, session 114, HB2018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-68-105(b), is amended by deleting
the word "and" at the end of subdivision (2), deleting the period at the end of subdivision (3) and
substituting instead the language "; and", and adding the following new subdivision:
(4) On or after July 1, 2026, require the law enforcement agency to accept and
honor any immigration detainer received from federal immigration authorities. As used
in this subdivision (b)(4), "accept and honor" means to comply with the requested
conditions in the immigration detainer and includes maintaining custody of the subject of
an immigration detainer for forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays, beyond the time when the subject would have otherwise been released from
the law enforcement agency's custody to allow federal immigration authorities to take
custody of the subject and notifying federal immigration authorities as soon as possible
prior to releasing the subject of the immigration detainer.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2018
009839
- 1 -